pt-PT: tamanho do projeto com fio de memória: Tornozeleira; Pulseira; Brinco/argola; Bobina multivoltas (universal); Colar/gargantilha; Anel; Outro
sv: Projektstorlek för minnestråd: Fotlänk; Armband; Örhänge/creol; Spiral med flera varv (universell); Halsband/choker; Ring; Annat
cs: Velikost projektu s paměťovým drátem: Náramek na kotník; Náramek; Náušnice/kruh; Víceotáčková spirála (univerzální); Náhrdelník/obojek; Prsten; Jiné
pl: Rozmiar projektu drutu pamięciowego: Bransoletka na kostkę; Bransoletka; Kolczyk/kółko; Sprężyna wielozwojowa (uniwersalna); Naszyjnik/choker; Pierścionek; Inne
ko: 메모리 와이어 프로젝트 크기: 발찌; 팔찌; 귀걸이/후프; 멀티 턴 코일(범용); 목걸이/초커; 반지; 기타
fi: Muistilankaprojektin koko: Nilkkakoru; Rannekoru; Korvakoru/rengas; Monikierroksinen kela (yleiskäyttöinen); Kaulakoru / Choker; Sormus; Muu
zh-TW: 記憶金屬線作品尺寸: 腳鍊; 手鍊; 耳環/耳圈; 多圈線圈 (通用); 項鍊/頸鍊; 戒指; 其他
en: Memory wire project size: Anklet; Bracelet; Earring/Hoop; Multi-turn coil (universal); Necklace/Choker; Ring; Other
bg-BG: Размер на проекта с тел с памет на формата: Гривна за глезен; Гривна; Обеца/Халка; Многовитова спирала (универсална); Колие/Чокър; Пръстен; Друго
ro-RO: Dimensiunea proiectului de fir de memorie: Brățară de gleznă; Brățară; Cercel/Rotund; Bobină cu mai multe spire (universală); Colier/Choker; Inel; Altele
da: Størrelse på hukommelsestrådprojekt: Ankelkæde; Armbånd; Ørering/creol; Spole med flere vindinger (universel); Halskæde/choker; Ring; Andet
lt-LT: Atminties vielos projekto dydis: Kojos grandinėlė; Apyrankė; Auskaras / rinkė; Kelių vijų ritė (universali); Vėrinys / prigludęs vėrinys; Žiedas; Kita
es: Tamaño del proyecto para alambre con memoria: Tobillera; Pulsera; Arete/argolla; Bobina multivuelta (universal); Collar/gargantilla; Anillo; Otro
th: ขนาดโครงการลวดหน่วยความจำ: สร้อยข้อเท้า; สร้อยข้อมือ; ต่างหู/ห่วง; ขดลวดหลายรอบ (อเนกประสงค์); สร้อยคอ/โชกเกอร์; แหวน; อื่นๆ
nl: Memorydraad projectmaat: Enkelbandje; Armband; Oorbel/oorring; Spiraal met meerdere wendingen (universeel); Ketting/choker; Ring; Overige
tr: Hafıza teli proje boyutu: Halhal; Bileklik; Küpe/halka; Çok turlu spiral (evrensel); Kolye/tasma kolye; Yüzük; Diğer
pt-BR: Arame de memória tamanho do projeto: Tornozeleira; Pulseira; Brinco/Argola; Bobina de várias voltas (universal); Colar/Choker; Anel; Outro
zh-CN: 记忆合金线材产品规格: 脚链; 手链; 耳环/耳圈; 多圈线圈（通用）; 项链/颈圈; 戒指; 其他
nb: Størrelse på memory wire-prosjekt: Ankelkjede; Armbånd; Øredobb/ring; Spole med flere runder (universell); Halskjede/choker; Ring; Annet
de: Projektgröße des Memory-Drahts: Fußkettchen; Armband; Ohrring/Creole; Mehrfachspule (universell); Halskette/Choker; Ring; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Veličina projekta memorijske žice: Narukvica za gležanj; Narukvica; Naušnica / obruč; Zavojnica s više namotaja (univerzalna); Ogrlica / choker; Prsten; Ostalo
ja: メモリーワイヤープロジェクトのサイズ: アンクレット; ブレスレット; イヤリング/フープ; マルチターンコイル (ユニバーサル); ネックレス/チョーカー; 指輪; その他
el: Μέγεθος έργου με σύρμα μνήμης: Βραχιόλι ποδιού; Βραχιόλι; Σκουλαρίκι/Κρίκος; Σπείρα πολλαπλών στροφών (γενικής χρήσης); Κολιέ/Τσόκερ; Δαχτυλίδι; Άλλο
vi: Kích thước dự án dây nhớ: Lắc chân; Vòng tay; Khuyên tai/Khuyên tròn; Cuộn nhiều vòng (đa năng); Vòng cổ/Vòng ôm sát cổ; Nhẫn; Khác
sk-SK: Veľkosť projektu s pamäťovým drôtom: Náramok na nohu; Náramok; Náušnica/Kruh; Viaczávitová cievka (univerzálna); Náhrdelník/Choker; Prsteň; Iné
it: Dimensione del progetto in memory wire: Cavigliera; Bracciale; Orecchino/cerchio; Bobina multigiro (universale); Collana/girocollo; Anello; Altro
fr: Format de bijou prévu pour le fil à mémoire de forme: Bracelet de cheville; Bracelet; Boucle d’oreille/Créole; Bobine multitours (universelle); Collier/Ras-du-cou; Bague; Autre
ru: Размер изделия для проволоки с памятью: Анклет; Браслет; Серьга/кольцо; Многовитковая спираль (универсальная); Ожерелье/чокер; Кольцо; Другое
hu: Memóriadrótos projekt mérete: Bokalánc; Karkötő; Fülbevaló / karika; Többhurkos spirál (univerzális); Nyaklánc / choker; Gyűrű; Egyéb
sl-SI: Velikost projekta z žico s spominom oblike: Zapestnica za gleženj; Zapestnica; Uhani/obročki; Večkratno navitje (univerzalno); Ogrlica/ovratnica; Prstan; Drugo